Washington statutes.
RCW 36.79.060

Powers and duties of board.

The board shall:

(1) Adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter relating to the allocation of funds in the rural arterial trust account to counties;

(2) Adopt reasonably uniform design standards for county rural arterials and collectors that meet the requirements for trucks transporting commodities.

[ 1998 c 245 s 31; 1997 c 81 s 5; 1988 c 26 s 4; 1983 1st ex.s. c 49 s 6.]